Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 3 Fugitives and Prevention of Crime

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d Arrest §§ 46, 47; 27A Am. Jur. 2d Escape, Prison Breaking and Rescue § 1 et seq.

Determination, in extradition proceedings, or on habeus corpus in such proceedings, whether crime is charged, 40 ALR2d 1151.

Identification of accused as the person charged, 93 ALR2d 912.

6 C.J.S. Arrest §§ 1 to 22; 22 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 13, 110, 115, 144, 146, 150 to 154; 30A C.J.S. Escape § 1 et seq.